Utah statutes.
53A-1a-514.   Tort liability.

(1)  An employee of a charter school is a public employee and the governing body is a public employer in the same manner as a local school board for purposes of tort liability.

(2)  The governing body of a charter school, the nonprofit corporation under which the charter school is organized and managed, and the school are solely liable for any damages resulting from a legal challenge involving the operation of the school.



Amended by Chapter 344, 2007 General Session

